North Carolina, session 2025, SB615.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 159-13 reads as rewritten:
"§ 159-13. The budget ordinance; form, adoption, limitations, tax levy, filing.
…
(c) The budget ordinance of a local government shall levy taxes on property at rates that
will produce the revenue necessary to balance appropriations and revenues, after taking into
account the estimated percentage of the levy that will not be collected during the fiscal year. The
budget ordinance of a public authority shall be balanced so that appropriations do not exceed
revenues.
(c1) For every year in which a general reappraisal of real property is conducted in a local
government, the governing board of that local government shall vote on the issue of whether to
levy taxes on property for that year at the revenue-neutral tax rate set out in G.S. 159-11(e). If a
majority of the governing board votes in favor of the issue, then the budget ordinance of that
local government shall levy taxes on property for that year at the revenue-neutral tax rate set out
in G.S. 159-11(e) and otherwise in accordance with subsection (c) of this section. If a majority
of the governing board votes against the issue, then the governing board shall levy taxes in
accordance with subsection (c) of this section.
…."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to budget
ordinances passed on or after that date.
*DRS45308-NIf-58D*